North Carolina, session 2025, SB398.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 35 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 14-269.5. Weapons at voting place.
(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term (i) "dangerous weapon" is as
defined in G.S. 14-277.2 and (ii) "voting place" is as defined in G.S. 163-165.
(b) Prohibition. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, it shall be
unlawful for any person to possess or carry, whether openly or concealed, any dangerous weapon
(i) at a location used as a voting place, (ii) within 100 feet from the door of entrance to a location
used as a voting place, or (iii) while in line to vote at a location used as a voting place. The
prohibition set forth in this subsection only applies while the location is open and being used as
a voting place.
(c) Punishment. – Any person who violates the prohibition set forth in subsection (b) of
this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.
(d) Exception. – The prohibition in subsection (b) of this section does not apply to a law
enforcement officer acting in discharge of the officer's official duties."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
*S398-v-1*